Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1115.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1341.2. Jazz Foundation of America plate.(a) Design.--The department, in consultation with the Jazz Foundation of America, shall design a special Jazz Foundation of America registration plate. The registration plate shall feature the Jazz Foundation of America logo consisting of a white saxophone, a white f-hole from a stringed instrument and a white trombone, that overlay a black background and shall include the phrase "Jazz Foundation of America" at the bottom.(b) Issuance.--Upon application of any person, accompanied by a fee of $62, which shall be in addition to the annual 12345678910111213141516171819 registration fee, the department shall issue the plate for a passenger car, motor home, trailer or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds. From the fee paid for each registration plate, $32 shall be deposited into the Jazz Foundation of America Fund.Section 2. Section 1905 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1905. Payments to special funds.* * *(e) Jazz Foundation of America Fund.--(1) The Jazz Foundation of America Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of providing grants to a nonprofit organization that provides financial assistance and facilitates performance opportunities for jazz and blues musicians. Grants may only be used to support the development of jazz and blues music within this Commonwealth.(2) All money in the Jazz Foundation of America Fund shall be appropriated on a continuing basis to the department and may only be expended for the purposes under this subsection.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250SB1115PN1359 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122